Hawaii statutes.
[§302A-614] Sabbatical leaves authorized.
(a) The department may grant a year's or six months' sabbatical leave of
absence to any teacher or educational officer who has served seven years in the
public schools of the State. The teacher or educational officer shall be
guaranteed a return to the teacher's or educational officer's or an equivalent
position at the expiration of the leave.

(b) In granting sabbatical leaves, the
department shall consider, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) The nature and length of professional educational
course work, research, or other professional activity approved by the
department; and

(2) Applicant's seniority; provided that seniority
shall not be the dominant factor in granting sabbatical leaves.

(c) The leave shall not be extended beyond one
year and may not be repeated until after a period of seven additional years of
service. [L 1996, c 89, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next